dictsource/it_rules
.group t
	t	t
	tt	t:
	tz (A	T:
	_) t' (P2t	 t
	@a) tria (_	t@-*'ia
	@a) trie (_	t@-*'ie
	a) ttoria (_	t:oR'ia
	a) ttorie (_	t:oR'Ie
	@) tt (ano_	=t:  // verbs
	en) t (ano_	=t
	@ma) to (L06_	t'O
	@a) to (L06_	=to
	intima) to (L04_	=to
	ba) tter (L04_	=t:e@-*
	tratta (L07_	t@-*'at:a
	tocca (L07_	t'Ok:a
	a) ta (si_	=ta
	_) togli (L04_	t'Ol^i
	trova (L07_	t@-*'Ova
	tieni (L04_	tj'e/nI
	au) tentica (L07_	t'ENtIka/
	a) ttiva (L07_	t:'iva
	taglia (L07_	t'al^a
	tira (L07_	t'iRa
	telefona (L07_	tel'Ef,ona
	L02) tre (_	t@-*'e
	_) tutt' (P5t	tut:

.group u
	u	u
	_) u (A	w2
	@)	u (dinY_	'u
	@) u (colo_	'u
	@) u (lA_	=u
	_) un' (P3t	un
	@) u (A_	=u
	A%C) u (A_	=u
	ural (Y_	uR'al
	C) ura (L07_	'uRa   // Pron.s verbs
	uder (L04_	'udE@-*
	uter (L04_	'ute@-*
	s) ucch (iaL07_	'uk:
	_) usa (L07_	'u:z,a
	uvano (_	'uvano // verbs
	ubano (_	'ubano
	ustano (_	'u:stano
	C) uo (tano_	U'O
	uomini (_	w2'Omini
	fanc) u (lA_	'u:
	f) uma (L07_	'u:ma
	com) unica (L07_	'u:nika

.group v
	v	v
	vv	v:
	vvi (A	v:i
	C) vi (A	vi
	C) vi (A_	=vi
	_) v' (P2t	v
	A) vino (_	=vino  // verbs
	@) vo (cano_	=vo
	in) via (toL04_	vI'a
	in) via (L07_	v'ia
	_in) vita (L07_	v'i:ta/
	_a) vvisa (L07_	v:'iza
	_in) vader (L04_	v'a:de@-*
	_) vota (L07_	v'Ota
	s) veglia (L07_	v'el^a
	volta (L07_	v'Olta
	venut (AL04_	ven'ut
	in) viata (L04_	vi'a:ta
	a) vvinghia (L07_	v:'ingja
	_) versa (L07_	v'e@-*sa
	_ri) versa (L07_ v'e@-*sa

.group w
	w	w2

.group x
	x	ks

.group y
	y	j
	y (K	i   // foreign words

.group z
	z	ts
	A) zz (A	ts2:
	_A) z (AC	dz
	_) z (A	dz
        _)	z (Y	dz
	z (oA	dz
	_A) zz (A	|dz:
	CA) zz (arC	dz:
	@li) zz (A	dz:
	_bri) zz (A	ts2:
	diri) zz	ts2:
	_indiri) zzar (L04_	ts2:'a@-*
	dri) zz (A	ts2:
	fri) zz (A	ts2:
	_ri) zz (A	ts2:
	_pi) zz (A	ts2:
	atti) zz (A	ts2:
	schi) zz (A	ts2:
	_spri) zz (A	ts2:
	stri) zz (A	ts2:
	_sti) zz (A ts2:
	appre) zza (rL04_	ts2:a
	care) zz (A	ts2:
	appre) zza (L07_	=tsa
	Ci) zz (A	dz:
	_mar) z (A	ts
	par) z (A	ts
	quar) z (A	ts
	sfar) z (A	ts
	ar) z (A	dz
	bron) z (A	dz
	@) zz (ano_	=ts2:
	i) zza (no_	=dz:a
	@@) zza (L07_	=dz:a
	@i) zza (ti_	dz:'a
	@i) zz (are_	|dz|:
	zion (A_	tsi'on
	ziona (ti_	tsiOn'a
	zional (Y_	tsion'al
	ziona (L07_	tsi'Ona
	organi) zzia (moL07_	dz:i'a:
	cra) zia (_	ts'i;a/
	cra) zie (_	ts'I;e/
	man) z (A	dz
	man) zia (_	ts'i;a
	man) zie (_	ts'i;e
	me) zz	dz:
	amma) zziamo (L04_	_tsi'a:mo
	sbara) zz (arL04_	ts:

.group ç

	ç	s
	A) ç (A	T
	C) ç(A	s

.group

	ñ	n^
	ć (_	tS
	ș	S
	ş	S

	_L16_)	: (_L17D_	_%%E_	// Say time

	á	''a
	é	''e
	éi (K	''eI
	ì	''i
	í	''i
	ó	''o
	ói	''o|I
	ò	''O
	òi	''OI
	ú	''u
	ù	''u

	D) , (D	v'i@-*gola
	__) - (_D	meno
        A_)  - (_D        _
	C_)  - (_D        _
	's (_S2t	s
